es: Tipo de recarga del humidificador del estuche: Recambio reemplazable; Reutilizable (humectable); Unidad de un solo uso/desechable; Otro
th: ประเภทการเติมสารเพิ่มความชื้นสำหรับกล่อง: รีฟิลเปลี่ยนได้; ใช้ซ้ำได้ (เติมน้ำใหม่ได้); แบบใช้ครั้งเดียว/ใช้แล้วทิ้ง; อื่นๆ
ru: Тип сменного наполнителя увлажнителя для кейса: Сменный картридж; Многоразовый (увлажняемый); Одноразовый; Другое
fr: Type de recharge d’humidificateur d’étui: Recharge remplaçable; Réutilisable (réhumidifiable); Unité à usage unique/jetable; Autre
nb: Eske luftfukterpåfyllingstype: Utskiftbar refill; Gjenbrukbar (kan fuktes på nytt); Engangsenhet; Annet
en: Case humidifier refill type: Replaceable refill; Reusable (rewettable); Single-use/disposable unit; Other
ja: ケース入り加湿器詰め替えタイプ: 交換可能なリフィル; 再利用可能 (再湿潤可能); 使い捨てユニット; その他
zh-TW: 盒式加濕器補充包類型: 可替換補充包; 可重複使用 (可重新加濕); 單次使用/拋棄式裝置; 其他
pl: Typ wkładu uzupełniającego do nawilżacza w futerale: Wkład wymienny; Wielokrotnego użytku (nawilżalny); Moduł jednorazowego użytku; Inne
sk-SK: Typ náplne do zvlhčovača puzdra: Vymeniteľná náplň; Opakovane použiteľné (zvlhčovacie); Jednorazové/jednorazová jednotka; Iné
vi: Loại chất làm ẩm hộp đựng: Ruột nạp lại có thể thay thế; Có thể tái sử dụng (làm ướt lại); Dùng một lần/vứt bỏ; Khác
hr-HR: Vrsta punjenja ovlaživača zraka za kutiju: Zamjenjivo punjenje; Za višekratnu upotrebu (može se ponovno vlažiti); Jedinica za jednokratnu upotrebu; Ostalo
lt-LT: Dėklo drėkintuvo papildymo tipas: Keičiamas užpildas; Daugkartinio naudojimo (drėkinamas); Vienkartinis blokas; Kita
sl-SI: Vrsta polnila za vlažilnik zraka: Zamenljivo polnilo; Za večkratno uporabo (možnost ponovnega vlaženja); Enota za enkratno uporabo; Drugo
ro-RO: Tip de reumplere umidificator cutie: Rezervă înlocuibilă; Reutilizabil (poate fi umezit din nou); Unitate de unică folosință/aruncabilă; Altele
bg-BG: Тип пълнител за овлажнител за калъф: Сменяем пълнител; За многократна употреба (овлажняващ се); Еднократен модул; Друго
ko: 케이스 가습기 리필 유형: 교체 가능 리필; 재사용 가능(재습윤형); 일회용 유닛; 기타
tr: Kılıf nemlendirici dolum tipi: Değiştirilebilir yedek; Yeniden kullanılabilir (tekrar ıslatılabilir); Tek kullanımlık/atılabilir ünite; Diğer
da: Refill-type til etui-luftfugter: Udskiftelig refill; Genanvendelig (kan fugtes igen); Engangsbrug/engangsenhed; Andet
el: Τύπος ανταλλακτικού/αναπλήρωσης για τον υγραντήρα θήκης.: Ανταλλακτικό που αντικαθίσταται; Επαναχρησιμοποιήσιμο (επανυγραίνεται); Μονάδα μίας χρήσης/αναλώσιμη; Άλλο
pt-PT: Tipo de recarga do humidificador de caixa: Recarga substituível; Reutilizável (humedecível); Unidade descartável/de uso único; Outro
zh-CN: 保湿盒加湿装置补充类型: 可替换补充装; 可重复使用（可再润湿）; 一次性设备; 其他
sv: Påfyllningstyp för luftfuktarfodral: Utbytbar påfyllning; Återanvändbar (återfuktbar); Engångs-/förbrukningsenhet; Annat
pt-BR: Tipo de recarga para umidificador de caixa: Refil substituível; Reutilizável (reumedecível); Unidade de uso único/descartável; Outro
fi: Kotelo-kostuttimen täyttötapa: Vaihdettava täyttö; Uudelleenkäytettävä (uudelleenkasteltava); Kertakäyttöinen yksikkö; Muu
it: tipo di ricarica per umidificatore Cassa: Ricarica sostituibile; Riutilizzabile (ribagnabile); Unità monouso/usa e getta; Altro
nl: Koffer bevochtiger navulling type: Vervangbare navulling; Herbruikbaar (hervochtigbaar); Eenmalig gebruik/wegwerpeenheid; Overige
de: Nachfüllart des Kofferbefeuchters: Austauschbare Nachfüllung; Wiederverwendbar (wiederbefeuchtbar); Einweg-/Wegwerfeinheit; Sonstige
hu: Tokpárásító-utántöltő típusa: Cserélhető utántöltő; Újrafelhasználható (újranedvesíthető); Egyszer használatos/eldobható egység; Egyéb
cs: Typ náplně zvlhčovače pouzdra: Vyměnitelná náplň; Znovupoužitelné (vlhčitelné); Jednorázová jednotka; Jiné